Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.080

Currency exchange license required.

(1) A person may not engage in the business of currency exchange or advertise, solicit, or hold itself out as able to engage in currency exchange for which the person receives revenue equal to or greater than five percent of total revenues, unless the person is:

(a) Licensed to provide currency exchange under this chapter;

(b) Licensed for money transmission under this chapter; or

(c) An authorized delegate of a person licensed under this chapter.

(2) A license under this chapter is not transferable or assignable.

[ 2003 c 287 s 10.]